Utah statutes.
17-30-12.   Vacancies -- Positions requiring special qualifications --
Competition suspended -- Promotion -- Promotional register.
(1) In case of vacancy in a position requiring peculiar and exceptional
qualifications of a scientific, professional or expert character, upon
satisfactory evidence that competition is impracticable and that the position
can best be filled by the selection of some designated person of recognized
attainments the board may, after public hearing and by the affirmative vote of
all members suspend competition, and all such cases of suspension shall be
reported together with the reason therefor, in the annual reports of the
commission.
(2)  Vacancies occurring in the merit system classification of any county
shall be filled by promotion insofar as possible.  A promotion shall be made
only after an open competitive examination, admission to which shall be
limited to merit system officers.  Such examination shall include an average
of service ratings for the next preceding year, a rating of seniority, and
test the competence of the peace officer to perform the duties required in the
position for which application is made.  The combined weights of service
rating and seniority shall be not more than 40 per cent of the whole
examination.  Succeeding vacancies shall also be filled by promotion until the
lowest grade is reached, which grade shall then be filled from the eligible
list as herein set forth.
(3)  After a promotional examination, the commission shall prepare a
promotional register which shall take precedence over an eligible register.
Certification therefrom shall be made in the same manner as from an eligible
register.
